voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat.lexc
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sg][Nm]kuivien[Bm]muoni:kuivienmuoni	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sp][Nm]kuivia[Bm]muonia:kuiviamuonia	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Ses][Nm]kuivina[Bm]muonina:kuivinamuonina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Str][Nm]kuiviksi[Bm]muoniksi:kuiviksimuoniksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sine][Nm]kuivissa[Bm]muonissa:kuivissamuonissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sela][Nm]kuivista[Bm]muonista:kuivistamuonista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sill][Nm]kuiviin[Bm]muonii:kuiviinmuonii	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sade][Nm]kuivilla[Bm]muonilla:kuivillamuonilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sabl][Nm]kuivilta[Bm]muonilta:kuiviltamuonilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sall][Nm]kuiville[Bm]muonille:kuivillemuonille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sab][Nm]kuivitta[Bm]muonitta:kuivittamuonitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sko][Nm]kuivine[Bm]muonine:kuivinemuonine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kuivamuona[X][Sin][Nm]kuivin[Bm]muonin:kuivinmuonin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sn][Ny]kultainen[Bm]noutaja:kultainennoutaja	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sn][Ny]kultaisen[Bm]noutaja:kultaisennoutaja	Omistusliite_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sg][Ny]kultaisen[Bm]noutajan:kultaisennoutajan	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sp][Ny]kultaista[Bm]noutajaa:kultaistanoutajaa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Ses][Ny]kultaisena[Bm]noutajana:kultaisenanoutajana	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Str][Ny]kultaiseksi[Bm]noutajaksi:kultaiseksinoutajaksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sine][Ny]kultaisessa[Bm]noutajassa:kultaisessanoutajassa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sela][Ny]kultaisesta[Bm]noutajasta:kultaisestanoutajasta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sill][Ny]kultaiseen[Bm]noutajaa:kultaiseennoutajaa	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sade][Ny]kultaisella[Bm]noutajalla:kultaisellanoutajalla	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sabl][Ny]kultaiselta[Bm]noutajalta:kultaiseltanoutajalta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sall][Ny]kultaiselle[Bm]noutajalle:kultaisellenoutajalle	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sab][Ny]kultaisetta[Bm]noutajatta:kultaisettanoutajatta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sn][Nm]kultaiset[Bm]noutajat:kultaisetnoutajat	Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sn][Nm]kultaiset[Bm]noutaja:kultaisetnoutaja	Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sg][Nm]kultaisien[Bm]noutaji:kultaisiennoutaji	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sg][Nm]kultaisten[Bm]noutaji:kultaistennoutaji	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sg][Nm]kultaisien[Bm]noutaja:kultaisiennoutaja	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviInJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sg][Nm]kultaisten[Bm]noutaja:kultaistennoutaja	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviInJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sp][Nm]kultaisia[Bm]noutajia:kultaisianoutajia	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Ses][Nm]kultaisina[Bm]noutajina:kultaisinanoutajina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Str][Nm]kultaisiksi[Bm]noutajiksi:kultaisiksinoutajiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sine][Nm]kultaisissa[Bm]noutajissa:kultaisissanoutajissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sela][Nm]kultaisista[Bm]noutajista:kultaisistanoutajista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sill][Nm]kultaisiin[Bm]noutajii:kultaisiinnoutajii	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sade][Nm]kultaisilla[Bm]noutajilla:kultaisillanoutajilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sabl][Nm]kultaisilta[Bm]noutajilta:kultaisiltanoutajilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sall][Nm]kultaisille[Bm]noutajille:kultaisillenoutajille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sab][Nm]kultaisitta[Bm]noutajitta:kultaisittanoutajitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sko][Nm]kultaisine[Bm]noutajine:kultaisinenoutajine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kultainennoutaja[X][Sin][Nm]kultaisin[Bm]noutajin:kultaisinnoutajin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]kultanen[X][Sn][Ny]kultase:kultase	Omistusliite_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sn][Ny]lämmin[Bm]ruoka:lämminruoka	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sn][Ny]lämpimän[Bm]ruoka:lämpimänruoka	Omistusliite_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sg][Ny]lämpimän[Bm]ruoan:lämpimänruoan	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sp][Ny]lämmintä[Bm]ruokaa:lämmintäruokaa	NimisanaLiOlAA_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Ses][Ny]lämpimänä[Bm]ruokana:lämpimänäruokana	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Str][Ny]lämpimäksi[Bm]ruoaksi:lämpimäksiruoaksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sine][Ny]lämpimässä[Bm]ruoassa:lämpimässäruoassa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sela][Ny]lämpimästä[Bm]ruoasta:lämpimästäruoasta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sill][Ny]lämpimään[Bm]ruokaa:lämpimäänruokaa	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sade][Ny]lämpimällä[Bm]ruoalla:lämpimälläruoalla	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sabl][Ny]lämpimältä[Bm]ruoalta:lämpimältäruoalta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sall][Ny]lämpimälle[Bm]ruoalle:lämpimälleruoalle	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sab][Ny]lämpimättä[Bm]ruoatta:lämpimättäruoatta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sn][Nm]lämpimät[Bm]ruoat:lämpimätruoat	Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sn][Nm]lämpimät[Bm]ruoka:lämpimätruoka	Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sg][Nm]lämpimien[Bm]ruoki:lämpimienruoki	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sg][Nm]lämpimien[Bm]ruoka:lämpimienruoka	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviInJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sg][Nm]lämpimäin[Bm]ruoka:lämpimäinruoka	NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviInJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sp][Nm]lämpimiä[Bm]ruokia:lämpimiäruokia	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Ses][Nm]lämpiminä[Bm]ruokina:lämpiminäruokina	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Str][Nm]lämpimiksi[Bm]ruoiksi:lämpimiksiruoiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sine][Nm]lämpimissä[Bm]ruoissa:lämpimissäruoissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sela][Nm]lämpimistä[Bm]ruoista:lämpimistäruoista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sill][Nm]lämpimiin[Bm]ruokii:lämpimiinruokii	NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sade][Nm]lämpimillä[Bm]ruoilla:lämpimilläruoilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sabl][Nm]lämpimiltä[Bm]ruoilta:lämpimiltäruoilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sall][Nm]lämpimille[Bm]ruoille:lämpimilleruoille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sab][Nm]lämpimittä[Bm]ruoitta:lämpimittäruoitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sko][Nm]lämpimine[Bm]ruokine:lämpimineruokine	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sin][Nm]lämpimin[Bm]ruoin:lämpiminruoin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sg][Ny]lämpimän[Bm]ruuan:lämpimänruuan	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Str][Ny]lämpimäksi[Bm]ruuaksi:lämpimäksiruuaksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sine][Ny]lämpimässä[Bm]ruuassa:lämpimässäruuassa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sela][Ny]lämpimästä[Bm]ruuasta:lämpimästäruuasta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sade][Ny]lämpimällä[Bm]ruualla:lämpimälläruualla	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sabl][Ny]lämpimältä[Bm]ruualta:lämpimältäruualta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sall][Ny]lämpimälle[Bm]ruualle:lämpimälleruualle	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sab][Ny]lämpimättä[Bm]ruuatta:lämpimättäruuatta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sn][Nm]lämpimät[Bm]ruuat:lämpimätruuat	Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Str][Nm]lämpimiksi[Bm]ruuiksi:lämpimiksiruuiksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sine][Nm]lämpimissä[Bm]ruuissa:lämpimissäruuissa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sela][Nm]lämpimistä[Bm]ruuista:lämpimistäruuista	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sade][Nm]lämpimillä[Bm]ruuilla:lämpimilläruuilla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sabl][Nm]lämpimiltä[Bm]ruuilta:lämpimiltäruuilta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sall][Nm]lämpimille[Bm]ruuille:lämpimilleruuille	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sab][Nm]lämpimittä[Bm]ruuitta:lämpimittäruuitta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]lämminruoka[X][Sin][Nm]lämpimin[Bm]ruuin:lämpiminruuin	Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sn][Ny]matala[Bm]meri:matalameri	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sn][Ny]matalan[Bm]mere:matalanmere       Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sg][Ny]matalan[Bm]meren:matalanmeren	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sp][Ny]matalaa[Bm]merta:matalaamerta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Ses][Ny]matalana[Bm]merenä:matalanamerenä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Str][Ny]matalaksi[Bm]mereksi:matalaksimereksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sine][Ny]matalassa[Bm]meressä:matalassameressä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sela][Ny]matalasta[Bm]merestä:matalastamerestä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sill][Ny]matalaan[Bm]meree:matalaanmeree	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sade][Ny]matalalla[Bm]merellä:matalallamerellä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sabl][Ny]matalalta[Bm]mereltä:matalaltamereltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sall][Ny]matalalle[Bm]merelle:matalallemerelle	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sab][Ny]matalatta[Bm]merettä:matalattamerettä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sn][Nm]matalat[Bm]meret:matalatmeret		Liitesana_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sn][Nm]matalat[Bm]mere:matalatmere		Omistusliite_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sg][Nm]matalien[Bm]meri:matalienmeri		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sg][Nm]matalien[Bm]mert:matalienmert		NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sp][Nm]matalia[Bm]meriä:mataliameriä		NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Ses][Nm]matalina[Bm]merinä:matalinamerinä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Str][Nm]mataliksi[Bm]meriksi:mataliksimeriksi	NimisanaLiOlI_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sine][Nm]matalissa[Bm]merissä:matalissamerissä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sela][Nm]matalista[Bm]meristä:matalistameristä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sill][Nm]mataliin[Bm]merii:mataliinmerii	NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sade][Nm]matalilla[Bm]merillä:matalillamerillä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sabl][Nm]matalilta[Bm]meriltä:mataliltameriltä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sall][Nm]matalille[Bm]merille:matalillemerille	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sab][Nm]matalitta[Bm]merittä:matalittamerittä	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sko][Nm]mataline[Bm]merine:matalinemerine	NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]matalameri[X][Sin][Nm]matalin[Bm]merin:matalinmerin		Liitesana_ä;
[Ln][Xp]meikä[X][Sn][Ny]meikä:meikä	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_ä	;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sn][Ny]musta[Bm]herukka:mustaherukka	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sn][Ny]mustan[Bm]herukka:mustanherukka       Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sg][Ny]mustan[Bm]herukan:mustanherukan	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sp][Ny]mustaa[Bm]herukkaa:mustaaherukkaa	NimisanaLiOlAA_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Ses][Ny]mustana[Bm]herukkana:mustanaherukkana	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Str][Ny]mustaksi[Bm]herukaksi:mustaksiherukaksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sine][Ny]mustassa[Bm]herukassa:mustassaherukassa	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sela][Ny]mustasta[Bm]herukasta:mustastaherukasta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sill][Ny]mustaan[Bm]herukkaa:mustaanherukkaa	NimisanaLiOlAA_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sade][Ny]mustalla[Bm]herukalla:mustallaherukalla	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]mustaherukka[X][Sabl][Ny]mustalta[Bm]herukalta:mustaltaherukalta	NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
